apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="d/ig__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ig</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ig</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>igs</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ug</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ug</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>igging</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>igging</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>igging</l>
        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/ive__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ives</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ived</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ove</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ived</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dr/aw__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aw</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aw</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aws</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ew</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>awn</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>awing</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>awing</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>awing</l>
        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dr/ink__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inks</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ank</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>unk</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dr/ive__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ive</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ives</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ove</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iven</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iving</l>
        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spel/l__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>l</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>l</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ls</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>led</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>led</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ling</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ling</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ling</l>
        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="withdraw" i=""><i>withdr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drink like a fish" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</l><r><g><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="drive drunk" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>drunk</l><r><g><b/>drunk</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="drive mad" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mad</l><r><g><b/>mad</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="dig" i=""><i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drink" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="draw" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drive" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ive__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="smell" i=""><i>smel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="spell" i=""><i>spel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="spill" i=""><i>spil</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="withdraw" i=""><i>withdr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drink like a fish" i=""><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</l><r><g><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="spill" i=""><i>spil</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dive" i=""><i>d</i><par n="d/ive__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dwell" i=""><i>dwel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dwell on" i=""><i>dwel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="dwell upon" i=""><i>dwel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/><p><l><b/>upon</l><r><g><b/>upon</g></r></p></e>
